Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1619.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Skill Gaming Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person that applies for authorization to engage in an act or activity regulated under this act."Cash." United States currency or coin."Cash equivalent." An instrument with a value equivalent to United States currency or coin, including certified checks, cashier's checks, money orders or any other representation of value as deemed a cash equivalent by the department."Controlling interest."(1) In the case of a publicly traded entity, the holding of sole voting rights under State law or under the entity's governing documents that entitles the person to elect or appoint one or more members of the board of directors or other governing body, or the holding of an ownership or beneficial interest in 5% or more of the entity's securities, unless the presumption of control is rebutted by clear and 20250HB1619PN1953 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 convincing evidence.(2) In the case of a privately held corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other privately held legal entity, the holding of securities in the entity, unless the presumption of control is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Distributor." An entity licensed by the department to sell, lease, offer, provide or distribute skill games to an operator for use or play in this Commonwealth."Entity." A domestic or foreign:(1) business corporation;(2) nonprofit corporation;(3) general partnership;(4) limited partnership;(5) limited liability company;(6) unincorporated nonprofit association;(7) professional association; or(8) business trust, common law trust or statutory trust."Establishment." An entity licensed by the department that permits a licensed operator to place and operate skill games on its premises under this act."Gross profits." The total amount of cash or cash equivalents received by skill games, less the total amount of cash or cash equivalents paid out to players as a result of playing skill games."Independent testing laboratory." A nongovernmental entity engaged in the business of examining skill game software and capable of providing the certification required under Chapter 7."Initial license." A license issued by the department to an 20250HB1619PN1953 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant under section 505 upon the applicant's first submission of an application and payment of the initial license fee under section 504(b)."License." A license issued by the department under this act that authorizes an entity to act as a distributor, operator or establishment or to engage in any activity regulated under this act."License application." The information required to be submitted on a license application form as determined by the department."Licensee." A person or entity that has been issued a license by the department under this act, including a distributor, operator or establishment."Operator." An entity licensed by the department to operate skill games by:(1) purchasing or leasing skill games from a licensed distributor;(2) placing skill games in licensed establishments; and(3) performing on-site reporting, revenue collection and data reporting as required under this act."Payout." The payment of cash or cash equivalents to a player as a result of playing a skill game."Person." A natural person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, unincorporated association, government entity not including the Commonwealth, estate, trust or foundation."Player." An individual who is at least 18 years of age and who plays a skill game."Principal." Any of the following:(1) An officer.20250HB1619PN1953 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A director.(3) A person who directly holds a beneficial or ownership interest in the securities of an applicant or licensee.(4) A person with a controlling interest in an applicant or licensee, or who has the ability to elect a majority of the board of directors of a licensee, or otherwise control a licensee, lender or financial institution associated with an applicant or licensee, other than a bank or lending institution that extends a loan or holds a mortgage or lien in the ordinary course of business.(5) A person designated as a principal by the department."Program." The regulatory program established under section 301(a) governing the distribution, sale, transportation, storage and use of skill games in this Commonwealth."Renewal license." A license issued by the department to a licensee under section 507 upon submission of a renewal application and payment of the renewal license fee under section 504(c)."Skill game." A game played on approved skill game software that meets the qualifications established under Chapters 5 and 7 and is licensed by the department under this act."Skill game software." A distributor's proprietary software program designed and developed for skill games and approved by the department."Terminal identification number." A unique identification number assigned to each skill game terminal."Terminal monitoring report." A report submitted by a distributor to the department identifying the location and 20250HB1619PN1953 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operation of each skill game, for the purpose of auditing and information retrieval related to financial events occurring in the course of operation, including data on location, coin-in, coin-out, ticket-in, ticket-out and jackpots.CHAPTER 3PROGRAMSection 301. Regulation of skill games.(a) Establishment of program.--A program is established within the department to regulate the distribution, operation and use of skill games in this Commonwealth. The program shall be implemented and administered by the department. For the purposes of the program and this act, the department shall have the following duties:(1) Issue licenses to individuals or entities authorized to distribute or make skill games available for public use in this Commonwealth in accordance with this act and regulations promulgated by the department.(2) Establish regulatory and enforcement authority over the program.(3) Develop enforcement procedures.(b) General authority.--The department shall have general and exclusive regulatory authority over the distribution and use of skill games under this act.(c) Specific duties.--The department shall have the following specific duties under this act:(1) Require and conduct, or cause to be conducted, criminal history investigations of applicants and licensees under this act.(2) For purposes of licensing, enforcement and background investigations, receive information otherwise 20250HB1619PN1953 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protected under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(3) Issue, approve, renew, revoke, suspend, condition or deny the issuance or renewal of a license or approval under this act.(4) Require each licensee to submit periodic reports as required by this act.Section 302. Distribution, operation and use of skill games.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the distribution, operation and use of skill games in accordance with this act are authorized in this Commonwealth. A skill game shall not be deemed to be any of the following:(1) A lottery, gambling device, slot machine, device intrinsically connected with gambling or coin-operated amusement device.(2) A game of chance as defined in section 103 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(3) A business operated in conjunction with another licensed business under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, or 40 Pa. Code § 3.52 (relating to connection with other business).CHAPTER 5LICENSURESection 501. Licenses.(a) General authority.--The department shall have the authority to issue licenses under this act.(b) Skill game license.--An application period for initial licenses shall commence 30 days after the effective date of this subsection. A license issued under this subsection shall remain 20250HB1619PN1953 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 valid for a minimum of one year or until the department establishes a schedule for annual license renewals.(c) License criteria.--The issuance of a license by the department shall be subject to the applicant's criminal history record and other eligibility criteria established by regulation of the department.(d) License renewal.--An application to renew a license shall be submitted to the department prior to the expiration date of the current license.Section 502. Licensing requirements.An entity, including each principal holding a controlling interest in the entity, that seeks licensure as a distributor, operator or establishment shall be considered an applicant and shall submit the following information with an initial or renewal license application to the department:(1) Valid government-issued identification, such as a driver's license or passport.(2) Naturalization documents or resident alien identification, if applicable.(3) Residential addresses for the previous five years.(4) Employment history for the previous five years, including dates of employment and the name and address of each employer, to enable the completion of criminal history and credit checks.(5) A completed individual questionnaire provided by the department for each principal residing outside of this Commonwealth.(6) Proof that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony within the preceding five years.(7) Proof of timely filing and payment of all Federal, 20250HB1619PN1953 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State and local taxes.Section 503. Granting licenses.(a) Authorization.--The department may grant, deny, revoke or suspend a license under this act.(b) Determination.--In determining whether to grant or deny a license, the department shall consider whether the applicant is able to comply with all applicable laws of this Commonwealth and regulations relating to the licensed activities.(c) Nature of license.--The issuance or renewal of a license under this act shall be deemed a revocable privilege and not a right.(d) Prohibition on multiple licenses.--An entity holding a distributor license may not hold an operator or establishment license. An entity holding an operator license may not hold a distributor or establishment license.(e) Appeals.--If the department denies a license application, the applicant may file an appeal within 30 days from the date the denial notice is mailed. The appeal shall be filed with the Secretary of Revenue. A final decision by the Secretary of Revenue may be appealed to Commonwealth Court.(f) Prior operation not disqualifying.--The prior operation of a skill game shall not serve as a basis for denying a license under this act.Section 504. License application and renewal fees.(a) Payment required.--Application and renewal fees shall be payable to the department at the time the application is filed.(b) Initial license fees.--Initial license application fees shall be nonrefundable. An initial license shall be valid for a period of 10 years. The following fees shall apply:(1) Skill game distributor: $50,000.20250HB1619PN1953 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Skill game operator: $5,000.(3) Skill game establishment: $250.(c) Renewal license fees.--Renewal license application fees shall be nonrefundable. A renewal license shall be valid for a period of 10 years. The following renewal fees shall apply:(1) Skill game distributor: $25,000.(2) Skill game operator: $1,000.(3) Skill game establishment: $250.Section 505. Issuance of license.A license issued by the department under this act shall be effective for the period specified by the department and shall include any information required by the department.Section 506. Term of license.(a) Initial license.--An initial license shall become valid upon issuance by the department and shall remain valid for a period of 10 years from the date of issuance.(b) Renewal license.--A renewal license shall become valid upon issuance by the department and shall remain valid for a period of 10 years from the date of issuance.Section 507. License renewal.(a) Renewal application.--An application for renewal shall include any information required by the department.(b) Denial of renewal.--If the department denies a renewal application, the department shall issue a written notice specifying the reasons for the denial and identifying the requirements the applicant failed to meet. The department may request additional information from the applicant before making a final determination. A final decision to deny a renewal may be appealed to Commonwealth Court.Section 508. Suspension or revocation of license.20250HB1619PN1953 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department may suspend or revoke a license if the licensee violates any provision of this act or any regulation of the department adopted under this act.CHAPTER 7CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTSSection 701. Skill game testing.(a) Certification.--Prior to an applicant obtaining a license, a skill game shall be certified in accordance with this subsection. The following shall apply:(1) Before a distributor provides or distributes skill game software that has not been approved as skill game software by the department under this act, the distributor shall submit to the department an engineering report and technical opinion prepared in complete forensic detail by a nationally recognized independent testing laboratory with experience in the testing of skill game software. The testing shall based solely on skill game software and adhere to technical specifications that are independent of those used for slot machines or video gaming terminals.(2) The engineering report and technical opinion under paragraph (1) shall comply with all of the following:(i) Be restricted in scope to technical details only and shall not constitute a legal opinion as to whether skill or chance predominates in determining the outcome, nor serve as a legal interpretation.(ii) Be signed by a principal or executive officer of the independent testing laboratory, whose signature shall certify the contents of the report.(iii) Include a written certification to the department that the skill game meets all of the following 20250HB1619PN1953 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criteria:(A) The skill of the player, rather than chance, is the predominant factor affecting the outcome of the game.(B) The prize outcome, whether for a single play or over a session of gameplay, is such that it is impossible to win the prize without the player exercising skill during the main phases of gameplay.(C) The skill game does not contain any hard-coded minimum or maximum payout percentage.(D) The skill game does not include reflexive or compensating algorithms that make gameplay harder for highly skilled players or adjust payout rates in response to gameplay outcomes.(E) The skill game maintains true and accurate gameplay records, including a minimum 10-game recall history and payout tracking with a minimum of 10 voucher recall entries. Accounting meters shall be at least eight digits in length, with a minimum of six digits to the left of the decimal.(F) The skill game limits the price to play to a maximum of $5 and the maximum winnings per individual game to $5,000.(G) The skill game displays the skill game software version and list of hardware components of the approved terminal in a clear and accurate manner.(3) A skill game shall remain certified unless material changes are made to the skill game software or hardware as determined by the department.(4) An applicant for a license as a distributor shall 20250HB1619PN1953 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submit the applicant's skill game software in a manner consistent with regulations promulgated by the department.(5) A distributor shall certify compliance with the requirements of this subsection to the department, and such certification shall be made subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(b) Independent certification.--A nationally accredited independent testing laboratory shall certify skill game software in accordance with this act.(c) Protection of intellectual property.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to infringe upon, compromise or make public any trademarked, copyrighted, trade secret or confidential proprietary material. Any intellectual property or related materials provided by a distributor to the department for purposes of certification or inspection shall be deemed confidential and shall not be subject to public access or disclosure.Section 702. Reporting.(a) Monthly report.--A distributor shall submit a terminal monitoring report for its licensed skill games. A monthly report shall be filed with the department and shall include the following information for the preceding month:(1) A complete accounting of all revenue derived from the operation of skill games in all establishments.(2) Gameplay statistics, including total cash-in, cash-out and the number of games played.(3) The physical location of all skill games in the possession of any distributor, operator or establishment in this Commonwealth.(b) Annual report.--By June 30 of each year, a distributor 20250HB1619PN1953 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall submit an annual report to the department for the preceding calendar year that includes all of the following:(1) The total number of skill games sold or leased to operators.(2) The number and type of skill games placed by operators in each establishment.(3) The total number of skill games in inventory as of June 30, along with the terminal identification numbers for each unit.CHAPTER 9DISTRIBUTORSSection 901. Authorization to distribute skill games.A distributor licensed by the department shall be authorized to distribute skill games that comply with the requirements of this act.Section 902. System requirements.(a) Currency acceptance.--A skill game shall be capable of accepting currency and shall distribute winnings through ejection of a bearer scrip, card or other medium approved by the department. The bearer instrument shall be redeemable only for cash at the establishment where the skill game was played. Winnings shall be redeemed at a ticket redemption terminal or by an attendant within the same establishment.(b) Rules of play.--A skill game shall prominently display the rules of play either on the game screen or on the terminal housing.(c) Placard display.--A skill game shall bear a placard, displayed in a prominent location and in a conspicuous color, stating:This game is licensed by the Pennsylvania Department of 20250HB1619PN1953 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Revenue and is NOT operated or maintained by the Pennsylvania State Lottery. Players must be 18 years of age or older to play.(d) Distributor and operator information.--A skill game shall display the name of the distributor of the terminal and contact information for the operator, including a mailing address and telephone number.CHAPTER 11OPERATORSSection 1101. Duties of operators.An operator shall have the following duties:(1) Provide skill games approved by the department and obtained from a licensed distributor.(2) Distribute skill games to licensed establishments in accordance with this act.(3) Collect and report all skill game income and related data to the distributor as required under this act.Section 1102. Reporting.An operator shall submit a terminal monitoring report to the distributor. The distributor shall compile the information and submit a monthly report to the department, which shall include all of the following information:(1) The terminal identification number of each skill game in the operator's inventory and at each establishment.(2) Any additional information required by the department.CHAPTER 13ESTABLISHMENTSSection 1301. Authorization to use skill games.An establishment may use skill games obtained from licensed 20250HB1619PN1953 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operators for public play and entertainment.Section 1302. Qualifications for establishments.(a) Eligibility.--Subject to subsection (b), skill games may be operated at any of the following:(1) An establishment licensed by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board.(2) An organization established under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).(3) A business that sells age-restricted products, such as tobacco, or that is qualified to be licensed by the State Lottery.(4) A business that submits a license application under this act no later than 90 days after the effective date of this paragraph. After the 90-day deadline, only an establishment, organization or business meeting the criteria under paragraph (1), (2) or (3) may operate skill games.(b) Licensing requirement.--An establishment, organization or business specified under subsection (a) shall be licensed by the department to operate skill games.CHAPTER 15PLAYERSSection 1501. Authorization to play and receive winnings.It shall be lawful for an individual who is at least 18 years of age to play a licensed skill game and to receive winnings in the form of a bearer scrip, card or other medium approved by the department, redeemable only for cash at the establishment where issued.Section 1502. Winnings as compensation.A player's net winnings from the play of a licensed skill 20250HB1619PN1953 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 game shall be classified as compensation under section 303(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.CHAPTER 17TAXSection 1701. Taxes on gross profits.(a) Applicable taxes.--Gross profits from the operation of skill games shall be subject to all applicable taxes, including sales and personal income taxes under Articles II and III of the the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(b) Prohibition on local fees and taxes.--No additional taxes or fees, including amusement taxes, shall be imposed on the placement or operation of a skill game or on the revenue generated by a skill game terminal unless specifically authorized under this act.CHAPTER 19ADMINISTRATIONSection 1901. Governing practices and procedures.The provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure) shall apply to all actions of the department under this act that constitute an adjudication as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).Section 1902. Law enforcement notification.Notwithstanding any provision of law, the department may notify law enforcement agencies of information relating to a violation or suspected violation of this act.CHAPTER 21CRIMINAL AND CIVIL PENALTIESSection 2101. Criminal distribution and operation of unlicensed 20250HB1619PN1953 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 skill games.(a) Penalties.--In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the person:(1) owns, operates, maintains, places into operation or holds a financial interest in an unlicensed skill game, skill game terminal or skill game software;(2) offers or makes the unlicensed skill game available to individuals to play or participate for direct or indirect consideration, including consideration associated with a related product, service or activity; and(3) allows players to become eligible for a cash or cash equivalent prize from playing the unlicensed skill game, whether or not the prize's eligibility or value is determined by or related to the outcome of or participation in the unlicensed skill game.(b) Forfeiture.--A skill game, skill game terminal or skill game software that is owned, operated, maintained or placed into operation in violation of subsection (a) shall be seized and forfeited to the Commonwealth. The forfeiture shall be conducted in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803 (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions).Section 2102. Criminal redemption of value to individual under 18 years of age.In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person commits a summary offense if the person provides value of any kind to an individual under 18 years of age in exchange for a 20250HB1619PN1953 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bearer scrip redeemable through an approved skill game terminal.Section 2103. Additional penalties.(a) Civil penalties.--In addition to any other remedy available to the department, the department may assess a civil penalty for any violation of this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act. The following penalties shall apply:(1) The department may assess a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation and an additional penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day the violation continues. In determining the amount of each penalty, the department shall consider all of the following:(i) The gravity of the violation.(ii) The willfulness of the violation.(iii) Any prior violations by the person.(iv) The economic benefit to the person resulting from the violation.(2) The department may issue a written warning in lieu of a civil penalty to any person or entity that aids, abets, counsels, induces, procures or causes another to violate this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act.(b) Sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the department may impose the following sanctions:(i) Revoke or suspend the license of a person found to have violated this act, a regulation promulgated under this act or an order issued under this act.(ii) Revoke or suspend the license of a person based on conduct, activity or an event that would have 20250HB1619PN1953 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disqualified the person from initially receiving the license.(iii) Order restitution of money or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a licensee.(2) A person who aids, abets, counsels, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this act shall be subject to the sanctions under paragraph (1).(c) Cost of enforcement.--The department may assess the costs of investigating a violation against a person found to be in violation of this act.(d) Insignificant violations.--Nothing in this section shall require the assessment of a civil penalty or the imposition of a sanction for an insignificant violation of this act if the department determines that the public interest is adequately served by the issuance of a written warning.CHAPTER 25MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2501. Conflicts with other laws.The manufacture, sale, distribution, possession and use of skill games approved by the department in compliance with this act shall not constitute a violation of any of the following:(1) 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.).(3) The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.Section 2502. Zoning and use requirements.(a) Requirements.--A distributor, operator or establishment shall only be required to meet the same municipal zoning and use requirements as other similar business types located within the 20250HB1619PN1953 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same zoning district.(b) Prohibitions.--A municipality may not:(1) prohibit the placement or play of skill games; or(2) enact zoning or land use restrictions that prohibit the placement, use or play of an approved skill game in a zoning district that permits any of the following:(i) The sale of beer, wine or spirits.(ii) The sale or play of State Lottery games at commercial establishments.(iii) Gaming or wagering conducted under 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to gaming).Section 2503. Notice.The department shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the department's commencement of licensing under this act.Section 2504. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1619PN1953 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718